Oklahoma, session 2026, HB3091.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 131.2 of Title 19, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
Any elected county official in the State of Oklahoma shall
maintain a principal residence within their jurisdiction and occupy
that principal residence for a minimum of seventy percent (70%) of
their term. Failure to comply with this section shall qualify as
dereliction of duty by the elected county official and the county
commissioners and the district attorney may begin proceedings to
Req. No. 16622 Page 1

remo ve the elected county official from office. For purposes of
this section, "principal residence" shall have the same meaning as
defined in Section 131.1 of this title.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.

60-2-16622 MJ 02/19/26


















Req. No. 16622 Page 2